Utah statutes.
17D-3-310.   Vacancies in the board of supervisors.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of board of supervisors member, the remaining members of the board of supervisors shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy, to serve the remainder of the unexpired term of the member creating the vacancy.

